non_repo/blackfoot_verb.lexc
! Verb ;

LEXICON Verb
0   AGR1 ;
0   TenseAspect ;

LEXICON AGR1
1+:nit^   TenseAspect ;
1+:n^     TenseAspect ;
2+:kit^   TenseAspect ;
2+:k^     TenseAspect ;
3+:ot^    TenseAspect ;

! hard-coded for the different combinations to avoid circular continuations
LEXICON TenseAspect
FUT+PERF+:yáak^Ikáá^    VStem ;
PERF+FUT+:Ikáá^yáák^    VStem ;
FUT+DUR+:yáak^á^        VStem ;
PERF+DUR+:Ikáá^a^       VStem ;
FUT+:yáak^              VStem ;
PERF+:Ikáá^             VStem ;
DUR+:á^                 VStem ;

LEXICON VStem
VII     VIAgr ;
VAI     VIAgr ;
VTI     VTAgr ;
VTA     VTAgr ;
